California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Powers and Duties  [79461. - 79482.]

79461.

The powers and duties of the commission shall include, but are not limited to, all of those contained in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79462.

The commission may adopt and from time to time alter, rescind, modify, and amend all proper and necessary bylaws, rules, regulations, and orders in accordance with commission procedures for purposes of carrying out this chapter, including rules for appeals from any bylaw, rule, regulation, operating procedure, or order of the commission. These actions of the commission shall not be subject to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79463.

The commission may administer and enforce this chapter and do and perform all acts and exercise all powers incidental to, or in connection with, or deemed reasonably necessary for, proper or advisable effectuation of the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79464.

The commission may appoint its own officers, including a chairperson, one or more vice chairpersons, and other officers as it deems necessary. The officers have the powers and duties delegated to them by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79465.

(a) The commission may employ a person to serve at the pleasure of the commission as president of the commission, and other personnel, including legal counsel of its choice, necessary to carry out this chapter. If any person employed by the commission engages in any conduct that the secretary determines is not in the public interest or that is in violation of this chapter, the secretary shall notify the commission of the conduct and request that corrective and, if appropriate, disciplinary action, be taken by the commission. If the commission fails or refuses to correct the situation or to take disciplinary action satisfactory to the secretary, the secretary may suspend or discharge the person.

(b) The commission may retain a management firm or the staff from any board, commission, or committee of the state or federal government to perform the functions prescribed by this section under the direction of the commission.

(c) If requested by an advisory board, board of directors, or any authorized agent, the commission may administer any governmental program related to the nursery products industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79466.

The commission may fix the compensation for all employees of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79467.

The commission may appoint committees composed of both members and nonmembers of the commission to advise the commission in carrying out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79468.

The commission may establish offices and incur expenses, enter into any and all contracts and agreements, create liabilities, develop, own, and control the use of any intellectual property, and borrow funds in advance of receipt of assessments as may be necessary in the opinion of the commission for the proper administration and enforcement of this chapter and the performance of its duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79469.

The commission shall keep accurate books, records, and accounts of all of its dealings, which shall be subject to an annual audit by an auditing firm selected by the commission with the concurrence of the secretary. A summary of the audit shall be reported to all persons subject to this chapter, a copy of which shall also be submitted to the department. In addition, the secretary, as he or she determines necessary, may conduct or cause to be conducted a fiscal and compliance audit of the commission. Except in the first year of operation, the commission shall prepare and make available an annual report within 90 days of the beginning of the fiscal year of all activities and the financial status of the commission to all persons subject to this
 chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79470.

The commission may present facts to, and negotiate with, local, state, federal, and foreign agencies and governments on matters that affect the California nursery industry, including, but not limited to, the maintenance and expansion of present markets, the creation of new and larger markets for nursery products, invasive pest issues, plant health, interstate and foreign export requirements, registration of pesticides, actions applicable to the state and federal environmental laws and regulations, applicable governmental regulations and statutes, and international trade agreements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79471.

The commission may conduct outreach, advertise, and educate and instruct the public and the retail and wholesale trade with respect to the quality, features, uses, and value of nursery products and the practices and methods of production used by nurseries.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79472.

The commission may conduct outreach and educate and instruct the wholesale and retail trade, including, but not limited to, their physical and electronic channels of distribution to markets with respect to proper methods of handling and selling nursery products, and conduct consumer, trade, and trading partner surveys and analyses.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79473.

The commission may conduct, and contract with others to conduct, research, including the study, analysis, dissemination, and accumulation of information obtained directly or from research or elsewhere, with respect to cultural, production and postharvest practices, and the sourcing, marketing and distribution of nursery products. The results of any research conducted by or on behalf of the commission may be used by the commission in any way it deems appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79474.

The commission may contract to receive and render services in formulating and conducting plans and programs and enter into any other contracts or agreements that the commission deems necessary to carry out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79475.

The commission may accept contributions of, or match private, state, or federal funds, and employ or make contributions of funds to other persons or local, state, or federal agencies for proper or advisable effectuation of the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79476.

In its discretion, the commission may cooperate with or provide funding to other private or governmental entities in the resolution of emergencies arising in the industry and impacting the health and safety of the public or to maintain the continued stability and reputation of the nursery industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79477.

The commission may collect information, including, but not limited to, industry crop statistics, identity and size of markets, and trading partners, and publish and distribute without charge, a bulletin or other communication to producers of nursery products.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79478.

The commission shall establish an assessment rate to be paid by producers to defray operating costs of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79479.

The commission shall establish an annual budget according to generally accepted accounting practices. The budget shall be concurred in by the secretary prior to disbursement of funds, except for disbursements made pursuant to Section 79466.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79480.

The commission shall submit to the secretary for his or her concurrence an annual statement of contemplated activities authorized pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79481.

The commission may investigate and prosecute civil violations of this chapter and file complaints with appropriate law enforcement agencies or officers for suspected criminal violations of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79482.

The commission may appoint any person to serve as an ex officio member.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Implementation and Voting Procedures  [79491. - 79499.]

79491.

(a) Within 60 days of a request from any producer, the secretary shall establish a list of producers eligible to vote on implementation of this chapter. The secretary may require producers to submit the names and mailing addresses of other producers. The secretary also may require that the information provided include information on the value of nursery products produced and sold by each producer or, in the alternative, may establish procedures for receiving the information at the time of the referendum vote specified in this article. The request for the information shall be in writing and shall be filed within 10 days following receipt of the request.

(b) Any producer eligible to vote whose name
 does not appear on the appropriate list may have his or her name placed on the list by filing with the secretary a signed statement, identifying himself or herself as a person eligible to vote. Failure to be on the list does not exempt the person from providing information requested by the secretary or the commission or from paying assessments and does not invalidate any industry votes conducted pursuant to this article.

(c) Any producer eligible to vote may contact those on the list regarding the referendum in a form and manner prescribed by the secretary if all expenses associated with those contacts are paid in advance. Subsequent to the implementation of this chapter and the establishment of the commission, the commission shall prescribe the form and manner by which eligible producers may contact other eligible producers regarding the administration of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79492.

This chapter, except as necessary to conduct an implementation referendum vote, shall not become operative until the secretary finds, in a referendum vote conducted by the secretary, that at least 40 percent of the total number of producers from the list established by the secretary pursuant to this article participate, and that either of the following occurs:

(a) Sixty-five percent of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this chapter, and the producers so voting marketed a majority of the total value of nursery products marketed in the preceding marketing season by all of the producers voting in the referendum.

(b) A majority of the
 producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this chapter, and the producers so voting marketed 65 percent or more of the total value of nursery products marketed in the preceding marketing season by all of the producers voting in the referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79493.

The secretary shall establish a period in which to conduct the referendum, which shall not be less than 10 days or more than 60 days in duration, and may prescribe additional procedures necessary to conduct the referendum. If the initial period established is less than 60 days, the secretary may extend the period. However, the total referendum period may not exceed 60 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79494.

Nonreceipt of a ballot by an eligible producer shall not invalidate a referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79495.

If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has been given as provided in this article, the secretary shall certify and give notice of the favorable vote to all affected producers whose names and addresses are on file with the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79496.

If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has not been given as provided in this article, the secretary shall certify and declare all provisions of this chapter inoperative. The secretary may conduct other implementation referendum votes one year or more after the previous vote has been taken.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79497.

(a) Prior to the referendum vote conducted by the secretary pursuant to this article, the proponents of the commission shall deposit with the secretary the amount that the secretary deems necessary to defray the expenses of preparing the necessary lists and information and conducting the vote.

(b) Any funds not used in carrying out this article shall be returned to the proponents of the commission who deposited the funds with the secretary.

(c) Upon establishment of the commission, the commission may reimburse the proponents of the commission for any funds deposited with the secretary that were used in carrying out this article, and for
 any legal expenses and costs incurred in establishing the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79498.

Upon certification of the commission, the secretary shall contact all producers by mail or call meetings of producers for the purpose of nominating and electing persons to the commission. All producers on the secretary’s list shall be given written notice of the meetings at least 10 days prior to the meeting date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79499.

Subsequent to the first election of members and alternate members of the commission pursuant to this chapter, persons to be elected to the commission shall be selected pursuant to nomination and election procedures established by the commission with the concurrence of the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Assessments and Records  [79501. - 79510.]

79501.

(a) The commission shall establish the assessment for the marketing season not later than May 1 of each year, or as soon thereafter as possible. The assessment shall not be more than six-tenths of one cent ($0.006) per dollar of gross sales.

(b) The commission may establish an assessment rate that is different for various classes of trade, including, but not limited to, different rates for retail sales than for wholesale sales, provided that
 rate does not exceed the maximum assessment authorized in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79502.

This chapter does not apply to nursery products produced only for a producer’s home use unless the use shall constitute a transfer of title between separate business entities held by a single owner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79503.

Any person requesting an exemption from this chapter shall file an affidavit with the commission attesting that he or she is not a producer, as defined in Section 79429, or produces nursery products only for his or her own home use without transfer of title between entities as specified in Section 79502. The affidavit shall contain all the information required by the commission. The commission shall review the affidavit, conduct any additional investigation it deems appropriate, and approve or deny the affidavit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79504.

Every person who produces nursery products for market, whether or not the nursery products are valued at more than the gross dollar value established pursuant to Section 79429, shall keep a complete and accurate record of the nursery products produced and sold and aggregated data on its customers and trading partners classified into statistical summary information in categories prescribed by the commission, and shall submit the records to the commission upon request in the time and manner specified by the commission. The records shall be in simple form and contain the information that the commission prescribes. The records shall be preserved by the person producing nursery products for a period of three years and shall be offered and submitted for inspection at any reasonable time upon
 written demand of the commission or its duly authorized agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79505.

(a) All information obtained by the commission or the secretary from producers and other persons required to keep and submit records pursuant to this article shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed except when required by a court order after a hearing in a judicial proceeding involving this chapter.

(b) In addition, and notwithstanding any other provision of law, all proprietary or trade secret information developed or gathered pursuant to this chapter, including, but not limited to, the names and addresses of persons subject to this chapter, individual quantities produced or sold, prices paid, and the products of research obtained by the commission, or by the department on behalf
 of the commission, from any source is confidential, shall not be considered a public record as that term is defined in Section 7920.530 of the Government Code, and shall not be disclosed by the commission or the secretary except when required by a court order after a hearing in a judicial proceeding involving this chapter.

(c) Information on volume shipments, crop value, and any other related information that is required for reports to governmental agencies, financial reports to the commission, or aggregate sales and inventory information, and any other information that gives only totals, but excludes individual information, may be disclosed by the commission in its sole discretion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 134.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

79506.

Any assessment that is levied as provided for in this chapter is a personal debt of every person assessed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79507.

Every producer shall be a trustee of the assessments owed to the commission until they are paid to the commission at the time and in the manner prescribed by the commission. Title to the assessments shall pass immediately to the commission upon the sale of nursery products resulting in an assessment, and the producer shall hold the assessments in trust for the benefit of the commission and shall remit them, with assessment reports, in the time and manner specified by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79508.

When the producer is a corporation, limited liability company, general, limited, or limited liability partnership, or trust, all of the directors and officers of the corporation, all of the members and managers of the limited liability company, all of the general and limited partners in the partnership, and all of the trustees of the trust, in their capacity as individuals shall be included, and any liability for violating this chapter, including, but not limited to, failing to pay assessments or file required reports, shall also include identical liability upon each director and officer of the corporation, each member and manager of the limited liability company, each general, limited, and limited liability partner in the partnership, and each trustee of the trust.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79509.

Any person who fails to file a return or pay any assessment within the time required by the commission shall pay to the commission a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the assessment determined to be due, and, in addition, shall pay 1.5 percent interest per month on the unpaid balance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79510.

In addition to any other penalty imposed, the commission may require any person who fails to pay an assessment or related charge pursuant to this article to furnish and maintain a surety bond in a form and amount, and for a period of time, specified by the commission as assurance that all payments to the commission will be made when due.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Violations [79511. - 79516.]

79511.

All violations of this chapter shall be prosecuted in accordance with the provisions of this article and, as appropriate, Sections 79509 and 79510.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79512.

A civil penalty not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) may be levied by the commission upon a person who does any of the following:

(a) Willfully renders or furnishes a false report, statement, or record required by the commission.

(b) Fails to render or furnish a report, statement, or record required by the commission.

(c) Secretes, destroys, or alters records required to be kept under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79513.

The commission shall establish procedures for the purpose of according individuals aggrieved by its actions or determinations an informal hearing before the commission or before a committee of the commission designated for that purpose. Appeals from decisions of the commission may be made to the secretary. The determination of the secretary shall be subject to judicial review upon petition filed with the appropriate superior court.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79514.

(a) The commission may commence civil actions and utilize all remedies provided in law or equity for the collection of assessments and civil penalties and for the obtaining of injunctive relief or specific performance regarding this chapter and the regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter. A court shall issue to the commission any requested writ of attachment or injunctive relief upon a prima facie showing by verified complaint that a named defendant has violated this chapter or any other regulation of the commission, including, but not limited to, the nonpayment of assessments. No bond shall be required to be posted by the commission as a condition for the issuance of any writ of attachment or injunctive relief.

(b) A writ of attachment shall be issued pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 485.010) of Title 6.5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that the showing specified in Section 485.010 of the Code of Civil Procedure is not required. Injunctive relief shall be issued pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that the showing of irreparable harm or inadequate remedy at law specified in Sections 526 and 527 of the Code of Civil Procedure is not required.

(c) Upon entry of any final judgment on behalf of the commission against any defendant, the court shall enjoin the defendant from conducting any type of business regarding nursery products until there is full compliance and satisfaction of the judgment. Upon a favorable judgment for the commission, it shall be entitled to receive reimbursement for any
 reasonable attorney’s fees and other actual related costs. Venue for these actions may be established at the domicile or place of business of the defendant or in the county of the principal office of the commission. The commission may be sued only in the county of its principal office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79515.

Any action by the commission for any violation of this chapter shall be commenced within two years from the date of discovery of the alleged violation. Any action against the commission by any person shall be commenced within two years from the date of the act of which the person complains.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79516.

The termination of this chapter shall not affect or waive any right, duty, obligation, or liability that has arisen or that may thereafter arise in connection with this chapter, release or extinguish any violation of this chapter, or affect or impair any right or remedies of the commission with respect to any violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Continuation or Suspension and Termination  [79521. - 79525.]

79521.

In the fifth year of operation of this chapter, and every five years thereafter, the secretary shall hold a hearing to determine whether the operation of this chapter should be continued. If the secretary finds after the hearing that a substantial question exists among eligible producers regarding whether the operation of this chapter should be continued, the secretary shall submit the chapter to a reapproval referendum. If a reapproval referendum is
 required, the operation of this chapter shall be continued in effect if the secretary finds that a majority of the eligible producers voting in the referendum voted in favor of continuing this chapter. No bond or security shall be required for a referendum pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79522.

If the secretary finds after conducting a hearing that no substantial question exists, or after a referendum that a favorable vote has been given, the secretary shall so certify and this chapter shall remain operative. If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has not been given after a referendum, he or she shall so certify and declare the operation of this chapter and the commission suspended upon the expiration of the then current marketing season. Thereupon, the operations of the commission shall be concluded and funds distributed in the manner provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79523.

(a) Upon a finding by a two-thirds vote of the commission that the operation of this chapter has not tended to effectuate its declared purposes, the commission may recommend to the secretary that the operation of this chapter be suspended. However, any suspension shall not become effective until the expiration of the then current marketing season.

(b) The secretary shall, upon receipt of the recommendation, or may, after a public hearing to review a petition filed with him or her requesting a suspension signed by 15 percent of the producers by number who produced and sold not less than 15 percent of the total value of nursery products in the immediately preceding marketing season, hold a referendum
 among producers to determine if the operations of the commission shall be suspended. However, the secretary shall not hold a referendum as a result of the petition unless the petitioner shows by a preponderance of the evidence that this chapter has not tended to effectuate its declared purposes.

(c) The secretary shall establish a referendum period, which shall not be less than 10 days or more than 60 days in duration. The secretary may prescribe additional procedures as may be necessary to conduct the referendum. At the close of the established referendum period, the secretary shall tabulate the ballots filed during the period. If at least 40 percent of the total number of producers from the list established by the secretary participate in the referendum, the secretary shall suspend the operation of this chapter if he or she finds either one of the following has occurred:

(1) Sixty-five percent or more of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of suspension, and the producers so voting sold a majority of the total value of nursery products in the preceding marketing season by all of the producers who voted in the referendum.

(2) A majority of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of suspension, and the producers so voting sold 65 percent or more of the total value of nursery products in the preceding marketing season by all of the producers who voted in the referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79524.

After the effective date of suspension of this chapter, the operation of the commission shall be concluded and all moneys held by the commission not required to defray the expenses of concluding and terminating operations of the commission shall be returned on a pro rata basis to all persons from whom assessments were collected in the immediately preceding marketing season. However, if the commission finds that the amounts returnable are so small as to make impractical the computation and remitting of the prorate refund to these persons, any funds remaining after payment of all expenses of winding up and terminating operations shall be withdrawn from the approved depository and paid into an appropriate state or federal program conducting or funding activities related to the subject
 matter of this chapter, or to a private nonprofit organization which has received tax exempt status under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and which benefits the California nursery industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79525.

Upon suspension of the operation of this chapter, the commission shall mail a copy of the notice of suspension to all eligible producers affected by the suspension whose names and addresses are on file.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 28. California Apiary Research Commission [79601. - 79705.]



  ARTICLE 1. Declaration and General Provisions [79601. - 79606.]

79601.

The California beekeeping industry provides critical pollination services to growers of over 90 California agricultural crops that constitute one-third of our daily diet and 37.5 percent of California’s total agricultural production. Additionally, California beekeepers rank in the top four states annually in honey production. The industry provides substantial and necessary revenues for the state and for its citizens.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 585, Sec. 1.   (AB 1912)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79602.

The establishment of the commission is necessary for the efficient creation and management of a research program to protect the health of honeybees, an integrated approach to manage pests and diseases common to honeybees, and to develop more efficient colony management practices. The commission is also necessary to ensure the existence of the segment of the industry that provides one-half of the queen bees, bulk bees, and starter colonies to other beekeepers throughout the United States and Canada. The commission is also necessary for the efficient development and management of state and national education programs that, combined with research, will enhance the competitiveness of the California beekeeping industry worldwide.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 585, Sec. 1.   (AB 1912)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79603.

The provision of pollination services, production of honey, bees, queen bees, and other hive products in this state is hereby declared to be affected with a public interest. This chapter is enacted in the exercise of the police power of this state for the purpose of protecting the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 585, Sec. 1.   (AB 1912)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79604.

The commission form of administration created by this chapter is designed to provide those engaged in beekeeping the opportunity to avail themselves of the benefits of collective action in the broad field of apiary research necessary to achieve the purposes stated in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 585, Sec. 1.   (AB 1912)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79605.

No action taken by the commission or by any individual commission member, that is in accordance with this chapter or with regulations adopted under this chapter, is a violation of the Cartwright Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16700) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), the Unfair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17000) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), or any statutory or common law against monopolies or combinations in restraint of trade.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 585, Sec. 1.   (AB 1912)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79606.

This chapter shall be liberally construed. If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held to be invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 585, Sec. 1.   (AB 1912)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [79611. - 79629.]

79611.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 585, Sec. 1.   (AB 1912)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79612.

“Apiary” means the physical location where beekeepers place one or more colonies of honeybees. As an adjective, “apiary” means pertaining to any aspect of beekeeping or the beekeeping industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 585, Sec. 1.   (AB 1912)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79613.

“Beekeeper” means a person who keeps bees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 585, Sec. 1.   (AB 1912)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79614.

“Bees” means honey-producing insects of the genus Apis. It includes all life stages of these insects. For purposes of this chapter, bees and honeybees are interchangeable terms.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 585, Sec. 1.   (AB 1912)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79615.

“Books and records” means books, records, contracts, documents, memoranda, papers, correspondence, or other written data pertaining to matters relating to the activities subject to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 585, Sec. 1.   (AB 1912)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79616.

“Colony” means the queen, the adult worker and drone bees, and the brood (eggs, larvae, and pupae) living together in a single society.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 585, Sec. 1.   (AB 1912)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79617.

“Commission” means the California Apiary Research Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 585, Sec. 1.   (AB 1912)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79618.

“Department” means the Department of Food and Agriculture.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 585, Sec. 1.   (AB 1912)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79619.

“Districts” consist of the following:

(a) District 1 consists of the California Counties of El Dorado, Marin, Napa, Sacramento, Solano, Sonoma, and all counties north of these counties.

(b) District 2 consists of the California Counties of Inyo, Kern, San Luis Obispo, and all counties north of these counties up to the southern boundary of District 1.

(c) District 3 consists of the California counties south of District 2.
